Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.130

Protection of bondholders—Mortgage insurance.

The commission is encouraged to adopt policies which will assure that bondholders will be protected against the failure to make mortgage payments financed under this chapter. Such policies may require, among other things, mortgage insurance.

[ 1983 c 161 s 13.]